Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.185

Family preservation education program.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a family preservation education program model curriculum that is available to each of the school district boards of directors. The model curriculum shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's website. The model curriculum shall include, but is not limited to, instruction on developing conflict management skills, communication skills, domestic violence and dating violence, financial responsibility, and parenting responsibility.

[ 2005 c 491 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2005 c 491: "The legislature finds that effective relationship skills are used in parenting, the workplace, schools, neighborhoods, and other relationships. The state has a compelling interest in encouraging its citizens in developing the parenting and communication skills vital for successful and fulfilling family relationships." [ 2005 c 491 s 1.]